Massachusetts, session 194th, S2626.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the select board
of the town of Berlin shall consist of five members, elected at large by the voters of the town.
SECTION 2. At the first annual town election following the effective date of this act,
three select board members shall be elected. The candidate receiving the highest number of votes
shall serve for a term of three years. The candidate receiving the second highest number of votes
shall serve a term of two years. The candidate receiving the third highest number of votes shall
serve for a term of one year. Thereafter, upon expiration of their terms, members shall be elected
for terms of three years.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1